Massachusetts, session 194th, S2099.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “court”, in line 2, the following
words:- 2 weeks before the hearing
SECTION 2. Said section 35 of said chapter 3, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following 4 paragraphs:-
If public testimony is being solicited, the legislative committee’s agenda shall include an
electronic mail address and physical mail address for the submission of testimony. The senate
and house clerk shall publish such information on the official website of the general court.
of 2

Said public testimony received by the legislative committee that is readily capable of
being reproduced shall be made available to the public upon request; provided, however, that the
legislative committee may redact public testimony that includes sensitive personal information or
information that may jeopardize the health, wellness or safety of an individual.
If the legislative committee solicits expert testimony, the legislative committee shall
make reasonable efforts to promote the diversity of expert witness panels. For purposes of this
section and section 35A, a legislative committee shall mean a joint committee, a committee
consisting exclusively of senate or house members or a special commission that is chaired by a
member of the general court.
SECTION 3. Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section
35 the following section:-
Section 35A. The senate and house clerks shall post all recorded votes of each member of
a legislative committee on the website of the general court as soon as practicable but no later
than 48 hours of the vote being taken; provided, however, that in the 2 weeks before the
conclusion of all formal business of the first annual session of the general court or the 2 weeks
before the conclusion of the second annual session of the general court the clerk shall post all
recorded votes as soon as practicable.
SECTION 4. Subclause 26 of section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “32,” in line 157, the
following words:- or office of the governor
SECTION 5. Section 4 shall apply to records of the office of the governor created or
received after noon on January 5, 2026.
of 2